print/tex/TeX3.14/contrib/tex/hyphen/hyphen.french.tex
'intero2                                                                       
'interu2                                                                       
'inters2                                                                       
'inte4r3                                                                       
.ma2lia2dres                                                                   
.ma2lia2dro                                                                    
.ma2liaisZ                                                                     
.ma2liap                                                                       
.ma2lia2v                                                                      
.ma2lien                                                                       
.ma2l1int                                                                      
.ma2lioc                                                                       
.ma2lio2d                                                                      
.mZ2giob                                                                       
.mZ2sies                                                                       
.mZ2s1i                                                                        
.mZ2s1u2s                                                                      
.mZta1s2ta                                                                     
.mono1a2                                                                       
.mono1Z2                                                                       
.mono1e2x                                                                      
.mono1i2                                                                       
.mono1o2                                                                       
.mono1u2                                                                       
.mono1s2                                                                       
.no2n1obs                                                                      
omni1s2                                                                        
oxy1a2                                                                         
palZo1Z2                                                                       
.pa2n1a2f                                                                      
.pa2n1a2mZ                                                                     
.pa2n1a2ra                                                                     
.pa2n1is                                                                       
.pa2n1o2ph                                                                     
                                                                               
.pa2n1opt                                                                      
.para1s2                                                                       
.pa2ria2che                                                                    
.pa2ria2chY                                                                    
.pa2r3hZ                                                                       
.per1a2                                                                        
.per1Z2                                                                        
.per1e2                                                                        
.per1i2                                                                        
.pZrio2                                                                        
.per1u2                                                                        
per3h                                                                          
.pe4r                                                                          
pZ2n1ul                                                                        
pZ2r1Z2                                                                        
.pZri1os                                                                       
.pZri1s2                                                                       
.pZri2s3s                                                                      
.pZri1u2                                                                       
photo1s2                                                                       
poly1a2                                                                        
poly1Z2                                                                        
poly1Y2                                                                        
pol1ye2                                                                        
.pos2t3r                                                                       
.postis2                                                                       
.prZ1a2                                                                        
.prZ2a3la                                                                      
.prZ2au                                                                        
.prZ1Z2                                                                        
.prZ1e2                                                                        
.prZ1i2                                                                        
.prZ1o2                                                                        
.prZ1u2                                                                        
.prZ1s2                                                                        
.pro1Z2                                                                        
.pro1s2cZ                                                                      
radio1a2                                                                       
.re1s2                                                                         
.re2s3cap                                                                      
.re2s3cisi                                                                     
.re2s3ciso                                                                     
.re2s3cou                                                                      
.re2s3cri                                                                      
.re2s3pect                                                                     
.re2s3pir                                                                      
.re2s3plend                                                                    
.re2s3pons                                                                     
.re2s3quil                                                                     
.re2s3s                                                                        
.re2s3t                                                                        
.re3s4tab                                                                      
.re3s4tag                                                                      
.re3s4tand                                                                     
.re3s4tat                                                                      
.re3s4tZn                                                                      
.re3s4tZr                                                                      
.re3s4tim                                                                      
.re3s4tip                                                                      
.re3s4toc                                                                      
.re3s4top                                                                      
.re3s4tr                                                                       
.re4s5trein                                                                    
.re4s5trict                                                                    
.re4s5trin                                                                     
.re3s4tu                                                                       
.re3s4ty                                                                       
.rZ1a2                                                                         
.rZ2a3le                                                                       
.rZ2a3lis                                                                      
.rZ2a3lit                                                                      
.rZ2aux                                                                        
.rZ1Z2                                                                         
.rZ1e2                                                                         
.rZ2el                                                                         
.rZ1i2                                                                         
.rZ2i3fi                                                                       
.rZ1o2                                                                         
.rZ1u2                                                                         
.rZuss                                                                         
.rZtro1a2                                                                      
sesqui1a2                                                                      
stZrZo1s2                                                                      
.su2b1a2                                                                       
sub1s2                                                                         
.sub1ur                                                                        
supero2                                                                        
supers2                                                                        
supe4r1                                                                        
.su2r1a2                                                                       
.su3r2a3t                                                                      
.su2r1e2                                                                       
.su3r2eau                                                                      
.su2r1int                                                                      
.su2r1if                                                                       
.su2r1ox                                                                       
tZlZ1e2                                                                        
tZlZ1i2                                                                        
tZlZ1o2b                                                                       
tZlZ1o2p                                                                       
tZlZ1s2                                                                        
thermo1s2                                                                      
tran2s1a2                                                                      
tran3s2act                                                                     
tran3s2ats                                                                     
tran2s3h                                                                       
tran2s1o2                                                                      
tran2s3p                                                                       
tran2s1u2                                                                      
.tri1a2c                                                                       
.tri1a2n                                                                       
.tri1a2t                                                                       
archi1Z2pis                                                                    
moye2n1S2g                                                                     
po1astre                                                                       
